Tennessee, session 114, SB0284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 12, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A visually impaired owner of a motor vehicle shall not be required to obtain a
commercial motor vehicle liability policy in lieu of a standard owner's policy of liability
insurance if the covered motor vehicle is not used for commercial purposes.
(b) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Commercial purposes" does not include paying or otherwise
employing a driver to operate a visually impaired owner's personal motor vehicle
on behalf of or for the benefit of the visually impaired owner in a manner that
would be considered a personal use; and
(2) "Visually impaired" means blind or partially blind.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to policies entered into or renewed on or after that date.
SB0284
000019
- 1 -